District of Columbia statutes.
1-907.05

Information about retirement programs.

Upon a request of the Retirement Board, he Mayor, the Chief Financial Officer, the Chairman of the District of Columbia Public Charter School Board, the President of the Board of Education, or their successors, shall furnish to the Retirement Board information with respect to retirement programs and post employment benefit programs to which this chapter applies as the Retirement Board considers necessary to enable it to carry out its responsibilities under this chapter and to enable the enrolled actuary engaged pursuant to § 1-907.03(a) to carry out the responsibilities of the enrolled actuary under this chapter.

Sept. 18, 1998, D.C. Law 12-152, § 135, 45 DCR 4045
Dec. 7, 2004, D.C. Law 15-205, § 1013(b), 51 DCR 8441

Application of Law 12-152: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 1-901.01.

For conditional applicability of subtitle B of Title I of D.C. Law 15-205, see notes under § 1-911.04a.

D.C. Law 15-205 substituted “the Mayor, the Chief Financial Officer, the Chairman of the District of Columbia Public Charter School Board, the President of the Board of Education, or their successors, shall furnish to the Retirement Board information with respect to retirement programs and post employment benefit programs” for “the Mayor shall furnish to the Retirement Board information with respect to retirement programs”.
1981 Ed., § 1-784.5.